Wyoming, session 2026, HB0033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-220.1 and 9-4-719(b)(intro) and
(q)(i) are amended to read:

9-4-220.1. Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account; funds transferred to the account.
HB0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0123

(a) There is created the Wyoming state penitentiary
capital construction account. within the strategic
investments and projects account created by W.S. 9-4-220.
Funds in the account shall only be expended upon
legislative appropriation. Through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2034, all funds within the account shall be
invested in the pool A investment account by the state
treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). Thereafter, all
funds within the account shall be invested as determined by
the state treasurer. All investment earnings from the
account shall be credited to the account. For purposes of
accounting and investing only, the Wyoming state
penitentiary capital construction account shall be treated
as a separate account from the strategic investments and
projects account.

(b) Beginning on June 30, 2021 2027 for fiscal year
2021 2027 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter as
provided in this subsection, the state treasurer shall
transfer ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), or as much
thereof as is available, from any unobligated funds within
the strategic investments and projects account general fund
HB0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0123
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account. The state treasurer shall cease transferring funds
to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction
account pursuant to this subsection on July 1, 2038.

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy
amounts; permanent funds.

(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
HB0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0123
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of by this subsection, revenues in
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2027 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:

(q) The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2016, which are less than the
spending policy established in subsection (d) of this
section are appropriated from the general fund subject to
subsection (s) of this section and the following:

HB0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0123
(i) Any earnings in excess of two and one-half
percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market
value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of
the fiscal year and less than or equal to the spending
policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section
shall be credited to the strategic investments and projects
legislative stabilization reserve account; created by W.S.
9-4-220;

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-220 and 9-4-719(b)(i) are
repealed.

Section 3. The strategic investments and projects
account is repealed.

Section 4. On July 1, 2026, all funds in the
strategic investments and projects account, except for
funds in the Wyoming state penitentiary capital
construction account, shall be transferred by the state
auditor to the general fund. Any unexpended funds that have
been appropriated or obligated from the strategic
investments and projects account on or before July 1, 2026
shall be paid from the general fund. Any funds that are
HB0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0123
directed to revert by law to the strategic investments and
projects account shall revert to the general fund. All
accrued revenues that would otherwise be deposited in the
strategic investments and projects account shall be
deposited in the general fund.

Section 5. Not later than October 31, 2026 and again
not later than October 31, 2027, the state auditor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee on the amounts
transferred under section 4 of this act.

Section 6. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0033